Hawaii statutes.
§291C-72 Pedestrians' right-of-way in
crosswalks. (a) The driver of a vehicle shall stop for a pedestrian who
is crossing the roadway within a crosswalk when the pedestrian is either:

(1) Upon the half of the roadway upon which the
vehicle is traveling; or

(2) Approaching the vehicle so closely from the
opposite half of the roadway as to be in danger,

and shall not proceed until the pedestrian has
passed the vehicle and the driver can safely proceed.

(b) No pedestrian shall suddenly leave a curb
or other place of safety and walk or run into the path of a vehicle which is so
close that it is impossible for the driver to yield.

(c) Subsection (a) shall not apply under the
conditions stated in section 291C-73(b).

(d) Whenever any vehicle is stopped at a
marked crosswalk or at any unmarked crosswalk at an intersection to permit a
pedestrian to cross the roadway, the driver of any other vehicle approaching
from the rear shall not overtake and pass the stopped vehicle.

(e) Every person who violates this section
shall be subject to the following penalties:

(1) For a first infraction, or any infraction not
preceded within one year by a prior violation of this section, a fine of $150;

(2) For an infraction that occurs within one year of
a prior violation of this section, a fine of $300 and revocation of the
person's driver's license and privilege to operate a vehicle for a period of
ninety days; and

(3) For an infraction that occurs within two years of
two prior violations of this section, and for the fourth and each additional
infraction of this section, regardless of when committed, a fine of $1,000, and
revocation of the person's driver's license and privilege to operate a vehicle
for a period of one hundred eighty days. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1; am L 2005, c
73, §3; am L 2007, c 125, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next